Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1912
Private examiner, defined.

Private examiner shall mean any examiner who performs or purports to perform the service of attempting to verify truthfulness or detect deception or providing a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception under any circumstances other than as a public examiner.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 12.